Utah statutes.
39-1-41.5.   Authority of military court judges -- Payment of witnesses.

(1)  Judges of military courts may:

(a)  issue a warrant to arrest an accused person and bring him before the court for trial, when the person has failed to obey a prior summons to appear before the court, and a copy of the charge or information has been delivered to the accused with the summons;

(b)  issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum, and enforce by attachment the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers;

(c)  sentence for a refusal to be sworn or to answer as provided in actions before civil courts; and

(d)  issue process in any county within the state.

(2)  Witnesses shall be paid in the same manner as in district courts.

